Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.190.110

Institutional education programs—Data—Recommendations.

(1) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall annually collect and post on its website data related to institutional education programs, disaggregated by gender, race, ethnicity, and age, including data on:

(a) Individualized education programs;

(b) Access to relevant instruction that is aligned with the youth's high school and beyond plan and any unmet graduation requirements;

(c) Student attendance;

(d) Metrics of student education status upon the beginning of residency in an institutional education facility;

(e) Student education progress during residency in an institutional education facility;

(f) Student education attainment during residency in an institutional education facility; and

(g) Long-term education and workforce outcomes of youth in and released from institutional education facilities as provided annually by the education data center under RCW 43.41.400.

(2)(a) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall also annually recommend modifications to the state board of education for changes to annual school improvement plan requirements in WAC 180-16-220 that would allow plans for state long-term juvenile institutions to be formatted for the specific needs and circumstances of institutional settings. In meeting the requirements of this subsection (2)(a), the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall seek input from institutional education providers and the department of children, youth, and families.

(b) In meeting the requirements of this section, the office of the superintendent of public instruction may make recommendations to the state board of education for changes to annual school improvement plan requirements based upon data collected under this section, other provisions of law, or both.

[ 2021 c 164 s 12.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2021 c 164: See note following RCW 28A.190.005.